Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2434
Acquiring person, defined.

Acquiring person shall mean a person who makes or proposes to make a control-share acquisition. If two or more persons act as a partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, syndicate, or other group pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, relationship, or understanding, whether or not in writing, for the purpose of acquiring, owning, or voting shares of an issuing public corporation, all members of the partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, syndicate, or other group shall constitute a person for purposes of this section.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 159.